Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE H. DISTRICTS GOVERNING GROUNDWATER

CHAPTER 8828. CLEAR FORK GROUNDWATER CONSERVATION DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8828.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a board member.

(3) "District" means the Clear Fork Groundwater Conservation District.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8828.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a groundwater conservation district in Fisher County created under and essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8828.003. FINDINGS OF PUBLIC USE AND BENEFIT. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8828.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district's boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of Fisher County, Texas, unless the district's territory has been modified under:

(1) Subchapter J, Chapter 36, Water Code; or

(2) other law.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8828.005. DISTRICT NAME CHANGE. The board may change the district's name when the district annexes territory.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8828.006. CONFLICTS OF LAW. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, if there is a conflict between this chapter and Chapter 36 or 49, Water Code, this chapter controls.

(b) If there is a conflict between Chapters 36 and 49, Water Code, Chapter 36 controls.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8828.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five directors.

(b) Directors serve staggered four-year terms.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8828.052. ELECTION OF DIRECTORS. (a) Directors are elected according to the commissioners precinct method as provided by this section.

(b) One director is elected by the voters of the entire district. One director is elected from each county commissioners precinct by the voters of that precinct.

(c) A person shall indicate on the application for a place on the ballot:

(1) the precinct that the person seeks to represent; or

(2) that the person seeks to represent the district at large.

(d) At the first election of the district after the county commissioners precincts are redrawn under Section 18, Article V, Texas Constitution, a new director is elected from each precinct. The directors shall draw lots to determine which two directors shall serve two-year terms and which two directors shall serve four-year terms.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8828.053. ELECTION DATE. The district shall hold an election in the district to elect directors on the uniform election date in May of each even-numbered year.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8828.054. QUALIFICATIONS FOR OFFICE. (a) To be qualified to be a candidate for or to serve as director at large, a person must be a registered voter in the district.

(b) To be a candidate for or to serve as director from a county commissioners precinct, a person must be a registered voter of that precinct.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8828.055. BOARD VACANCY. (a) The board shall appoint a replacement to fill a vacancy in the office of any director.

(b) The appointed replacement serves until the next directors' election.

(c) If the position is not scheduled to be filled at the next election, the person elected to fill the position serves only for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8828.101. GROUNDWATER CONSERVATION DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. Except as provided by this chapter, the district has the rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapter 36, Water Code, applicable to groundwater conservation districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2011.

Sec. 8828.102. NO EMINENT DOMAIN POWER. The district does not have the power of eminent domain.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8828.151. DISTRICT REVENUE. To pay the district's maintenance and operating costs, the district may:

(1) impose an ad valorem tax at a rate not to exceed five cents for each $100 of taxable value of property in the district;

(2) assess general production fees;

(3) solicit and accept grants from any public or private source; and

(4) assess a transfer fee on water exported from the district.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (H.B. 2619), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2011.